Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-917. Evaluation protocol — Sexually dangerous persons — Juveniles adjudicated delinquent — Examiners.

The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall develop an evaluation protocol for preparing reports to assist courts in making determinations whether or not a person adjudicated guilty of a sex offense should be considered a sexually dangerous person for purposes of this subchapter.

The committee shall also establish qualifications for examiners and qualify examiners to prepare reports in accordance with the evaluation protocol.

The committee shall cause an assessment to be conducted on a case-by-case basis of the public risk posed by a sex offender or sexually dangerous person:

Who is required to register under § 12-12-905 after August 1, 1997; and

For whom the Arkansas Crime Information Center has no record of an assessment's being done and a risk level established subsequent to August 1, 1997.

An adult offender convicted of an offense described in 42 U.S.C. § 14071 et seq., as it existed on March 1, 2003, Pub. L. No. 109-248, as it existed on January 1, 2007, or § 12-12-903(13) shall be assessed.

(a)Subject to subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the prosecuting attorney and any law enforcement agency shall furnish the file relating to the offender to Community Notification Assessment at the Division of Correction within thirty (30) days of an offender's adjudication of guilt.

(1)The prosecuting attorney shall make a copy of any relevant records concerning the offender and shall forward the copied relevant records to Community Notification Assessment within thirty (30) days of the adjudication.

Arrest reports;

Incident reports;

Offender statements;

Judgment and disposition forms;

Medical records;

Witness statements; and

Any record considered relevant by the prosecuting attorney.

A sex offender sentenced to life, life without parole, or death shall be assessed only if the sex offender is being considered for release.

A sex offender currently in the state who has not been assessed and classified shall be identified by the center.

If a sex offender fails to appear for assessment, is aggressive, threatening, or disruptive to the point that Community Notification Assessment staff cannot proceed with the assessment process, or voluntarily terminates the assessment process after having been advised of the potential consequences:

The sex offender shall be classified as a risk Level 3 or referred to the Sex Offender Assessment Committee as a risk Level 4; and

The parole or probation officer, if applicable, shall be notified.

A sex offender has immunity for a statement made by him or her in the course of assessment with respect to prior conduct under the immunity provisions of § 16-43-601 et seq.

Assessment personnel shall report ongoing child maltreatment as required under the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.

To the extent permissible and under the procedures established by state rules and federal regulations, public agencies shall provide the committee access to all relevant records and information in the possession of public agencies or any private entity contracting with a public agency relating to the sex offender or sexually dangerous person under review.

The records and information include, but are not limited to:

Police reports;

Statements of probable cause;

Presentence investigations and reports;

Complete judgments and sentences;

Current classification referrals;

Criminal history summaries;

Violation and disciplinary reports;

All psychological evaluations and psychiatric hospital reports;

Sex offender or sexually dangerous person treatment program reports;

Juvenile court records;

Victim impact statements;

Investigation reports to the Child Abuse Hotline, the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services, and any entity contracting with the Department of Human Services for investigation or treatment of sexual or physical abuse or domestic violence; and

Statements of medical providers treating victims of sex offenses indicating the extent of injury to the victim.

Records and information obtained under this section shall not be subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., unless otherwise authorized by law.

The sex offender or sexually dangerous person shall have access to records and information generated and maintained by the committee.

These records shall include any reports of the assessment and the tape of the interview but do not include restricted source documents of commercial psychological tests or working notes of staff.

Unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, records and information generated by other agencies and obtained under this section shall not be available to the sex offender or sexually dangerous person except through the agency or individual having primary custody of the records.

Upon request, the sex offender shall be given a list of the records or information obtained.

If the record or information generated contains the address of a victim or a person who has made a statement adverse to the sex offender or sexually dangerous person, the address shall be redacted and the sex offender or sexually dangerous person shall have access to records and information other than the identity and address.

In classifying the sex offender into a risk level for the purposes of public notification under § 12-12-913, the committee, through its staff, shall review each sex offender or sexually dangerous person under its authority:

Prior to the sex offender's release for confinement in a correctional facility;

Prior to the release of a person who has been committed following an acquittal on the grounds of mental disease or defect;

At the start of a sex offender's suspended imposition of sentence; or

At the start of a sex offender's probation period.

The committee shall issue the offender fact sheet to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

The offender fact sheet is provided to assist the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in its task of community notification.

The committee shall provide the Parole Board with copies of the offender fact sheet on inmates of the Division of Correction.

The committee shall provide the Division of Community Correction with copies of the offender fact sheet on any sex offender under the Division of Community Correction's supervision.

The offender fact sheet shall be prepared on a standard form for ease of transmission and communication.

The offender fact sheet shall be on an internet-based application accessible to law enforcement, state boards, and licensing agencies.

The offender fact sheet of a sexually dangerous person or a sex offender found by the center to be in violation of the registration requirement shall be made available to the general public unless the release of the offender fact sheet, in the opinion of the committee based on a risk assessment, places an innocent individual at risk.

The standard form shall include, but not be limited to:

Registration information as required in § 12-12-908;

Risk level;

Date of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) sample;

Psychological factors likely to affect sexual control;

Victim age and gender preference;

Treatment history and recommendations; and

Other relevant information deemed necessary by the committee or by professional staff performing sex offender assessments.

The committee shall ensure that the notice is complete in its entirety.

A law enforcement officer shall notify the center if a sex offender has moved or is otherwise in violation of a registration requirement.

All material used in the assessment shall be kept on file in its original form for one (1) year.

After one (1) year the file may be stored electronically.

In cooperation with the committee, the Division of Correction shall promulgate rules to establish the review process for assessment determinations.

The sex offender or sexually dangerous person may request an administrative review of the assigned risk level under the conditions stated and following the procedures indicated under § 12-12-922.

The sex offender shall be notified of these rights and procedures in the documentation sent with the notification of risk level.

A sex offender or sexually dangerous person may request the committee to reassess the assigned risk level of the sex offender or sexually dangerous person after five (5) years have elapsed since initial risk assessment by the committee and may renew that request one (1) time every five (5) years.

In the request for reassessment, the sex offender or sexually dangerous person shall list the facts and circumstances that demonstrate that the sex offender no longer poses the same degree of risk to the community.

A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, the Division of Community Correction, or the Parole Board may request the committee to reassess a sex offender's assigned risk level at any time.

In the request for reassessment, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, the Division of Community Correction, or the Parole Board shall list the facts and circumstances that prompted the requested reassessment.

The committee shall also take into consideration any subsequent criminal act by the sex offender or sexually dangerous person during a reassessment.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 10. This section was also amended by Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 11 to read as follows:

“The Sex Offenders Assessment Committee shall develop an evaluation protocol for preparing reports to assist courts in making determinations whether or not a person adjudicated guilty of a sexually violent offense should be considered a sexually violent predator for purposes of this subchapter. The committee shall also establish qualifications for and qualify examiners to prepare reports in accordance with the evaluation protocol.”

Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (b)(4)(A), substituted “state” for “community” and “center” for “Arkansas Crime Information Center”; and, in (b)(4)(B)(ii)(b ), substituted “A sex offender shall have immunity for a statement” for “Statements,” “him or her” for “a sex offender,” and deleted “shall be deemed to have been given use immunity” preceding “under the immunity provisions.”

The 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment rewrote (b).

The 2009 amendment substituted “Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.” for “Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq.” in (b)(4)(C).

The 2013 amendment substituted “dangerous persons” for “violent predators” in the section heading; substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” and “Community Notification Assessment” for “Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment” throughout the section; substituted “dangerous person or” for “violent predator and” in (f)(4)(A)(iii); rewrote (h)(1)(A); and inserted “or sexually dangerous person” in (h)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by 315 inserted “rules” in (c)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (g)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout the section.

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — Initial Classification Determination. 65 A.L.R.6th 1.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Circuit court properly affirmed the Sex Offender Assessment Committee's reassessment of defendant's community-notification status; while the county deputy prosecuting attorney was not authorized to request risk-level reassessment, defendant failed to raise the issue before the Committee.Sarna v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Comm., 2017 Ark. App. 684, 537 S.W.3d 312 (2017).

Under the flexible Mathews factors, the procedural avenues afforded by the Sex Offender Registration Act, §12-12-901 et seq., were constitutionally adequate and provided notice to offenders of the risk assessment process and a meaningful opportunity to be heard; the Registration Act provides for an adversarial judicial review of the Sex Offender Assessment Committee's administrative review decision, with the full procedural guarantees set forth in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, and it was unlikely that a right to counsel or to confront witnesses at the initial assessment stage would have appreciably reduced the risk of an erroneous determination.Weems v. Little Rock Police Dep't, 453 F.3d 1010 (8th Cir. 2006), cert. denied, 550 U.S. 917, 127 S. Ct. 2128, 167 L. Ed. 2d 862 (2007).

Regardless of the reason one was required to register as a sex offender, the procedures afforded by the Sex Offender Registration Act, §12-12-901 et seq., were the same; those procedures comported with procedural due-process requirements.Ark. Dep't of Corr. v. Bailey, 368 Ark. 518, 247 S.W.3d 851 (2007).

Alleged sex offender's due process rights under the United States and Arkansas Constitutions were not violated by a determination that he was a Level 3 offender because he had a meaningful opportunity to be heard through a face-to-face interview and review by a sex offender assessment committee. A second face-to-face interview was not required.Burchette v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 374 Ark. 467, 288 S.W.3d 614 (2008).

Where the Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee specifically found that the documents it received pursuant to subsection (c) of this section reflected appellant was convicted of two separate sexual assaults on two separate women, admitted that he had been involved in forced sex acts, could not stand rejection, thought about raping, and said that raping made him feel better, there was substantial evidence to support the Committee's assessment of appellant as a level four offender. The Committee did not improperly base appellant's classification upon his demeanor.Parkman v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. 205, 307 S.W.3d 6 (2009).

Under this section and §§12-12-913 and12-12-922, the evidence supported the sex offender's Level 2 assessment where his victim was outside the home and a Level 1 assessment only required notification inside the home and to local law enforcement, which was insufficient; the offender also indicated refusal to participate in sex-offender treatment.Gwaltney v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. App. 668 (2009).

Cited: Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment v. Claybaugh, 93 Ark. App. 11, 216 S.W.3d 134 (2005).

Copies of the report shall be forwarded immediately to the prosecutor and to the defense attorney.

The report shall not be admissible for purposes of sentencing.

After sentencing, the court shall make a determination regarding the defendant's status as a sexually dangerous person.

(1)In order for the examiner qualified by the committee to prepare the report:

The defendant may be sent for evaluation to a facility designated by the Division of Correction; or

The committee may elect to send an examiner to the local or regional detention facility.

The cost of the evaluation shall be paid by the Division of Correction.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (b)(1)(A) and (b)(2).

Sex Offender Assessment Committee did not exceed its authority in assessing defendant as a Level 4 sex offender where this section had not been enacted at the time of his rape conviction, and thus the court presiding over his conviction in 1992 could not have made a designation under this section. Also, §12-12-922 alternatively gives the Committee authority to conduct its own assessment as to whether a defendant is a sexually dangerous person.Dillard v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2016 Ark. App. 147, 485 S.W.3d 701 (2016).

Cited: Green v. State, 2013 Ark. App. 63 (2013).

(1)Should evidence be found in the course of any assessment conducted by the committee that a defendant appears to meet the criteria for being classified as a sexually dangerous person, the committee shall bring this information to the attention of the prosecutor, who will determine whether to file a petition with the court for the defendant to be classified as a sexually dangerous person.

(1)The judgment and commitment order should state whether the offense qualifies as an aggravated sex offense.

Lifetime registration is required for a sex offender who:

Was convicted of rape by forcible compulsion, § 5-14-103(a)(1), or other substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction; or

Has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of failing to comply with registration and reporting requirements under § 12-12-904 three (3) or more times.

The court shall hold a hearing on the application at which the applicant and any interested persons may present witnesses and other evidence.

No less than twenty (20) days before the date of the hearing on the application, a copy of the application for termination of the obligation to register shall be served on:

The prosecutor of the county in which the adjudication of guilt triggering registration was obtained if the sex offender was convicted in this state; or

The prosecutor of the county where a sex offender resides if the sex offender was convicted in another state.

A copy also shall be served to the Arkansas Sex Offender Registry in the Arkansas Crime Information Center and to Community Notification Assessment at least twenty (20) days before the hearing.

If the sex offender has not been assessed in the five (5) years before making a request to terminate the obligation to register under this section, the prosecuting attorney may request a reassessment and an order terminating the obligation to register shall not be granted without a reassessment.

The court shall grant an order terminating the obligation to register upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The applicant, for a period of fifteen (15) years after the applicant was released from prison or other institution or placed on parole, supervised release, or probation has not been adjudicated guilty of a sex offense; and

The applicant is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of others.

(A)A sex offender required to register as a result of a conviction for permitting the physical abuse of a minor under §5-27-221 may apply for termination of the obligation to register at any time after July 22, 2015.

The court shall grant an order under this subdivision (b)(3) terminating the obligation to register upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence that the facts underlying the offense for which the sex offender is required to register no longer support a requirement to register.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by No. 172 substituted “apply” for “make application” and “make an application” in (b)(1)(A)(i) and (b)(1)(A)(ii); and rewrote (b)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2013 amendment by No. 505 substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1248 inserted “who” at the end of the introductory language of (a); substituted “Was found” for “Found” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “Was determined” for “Determined” and “to be or assessed as a Level 4 sexually” for “to be a sexually”; and substituted “Has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of” for “Found to have been adjudicated guilty of” in (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment by No. 358 added (c).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1285 added (b)(3).

The 2017 amendment by No. 382 added (d).

The 2017 amendment by No. 538 added (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(5); rewrote (b)(1)(A); added (b)(1)(C); and substituted “three (3) years” for “one (1) year” in (c).

Subdivision (a)(3) of this section, requiring lifetime registration as applied to petitioner, did not violate his equal protection rights as there was a rational basis for treating sex offenders convicted under more than one case number differently than those convicted under a single case number. Individuals convicted of a subsequent sex offense under a second case number have committed more than one sex crime, and the General Assembly could have concluded that those individuals are more likely to reoffend; and the underinclusiveness of a particular provision does not make the provision unconstitutional.Ray v. State, 2017 Ark. App. 574, 533 S.W.3d 587 (2017).

There was no merit to petitioner's ex post facto claims where he offered no explanation as to how the 2001 amendment to this section, which added the lifetime registration provisions, rendered the registration requirement punitive in nature.Ray v. State, 2017 Ark. App. 574, 533 S.W.3d 587 (2017).

That the prosecutor or court may chose to combine multiple charges under one case number for some sex offenders and not others does not render subdivision (a)(3) of this section unconstitutional.Wyly v. State, 2018 Ark. App. 505, 559 S.W.3d 326 (2018).

Subdivision (a)(3) of this section, as applied to appellant, did not violate due process. While appellant contended that application of the 2001 statutory provision requiring lifetime registration to the guilty pleas he made on the same day in 2000 to two offenses with different case numbers removed his right to petition the court to end his registration requirement, the 2001 provision did not impose a new legal consequence that violated due process. The registration requirement was in effect when appellant was convicted, and removal of the requirement was never guaranteed.Wyly v. State, 2018 Ark. App. 505, 559 S.W.3d 326 (2018).

There is no requirement in this section that an applicant admit guilt.State v. Khabeer, 2014 Ark. 107 (2014).

Circuit court did not clearly err under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section in terminating appellee's obligation to register as a sex offender on the ground that he was not likely to pose a threat to the safety of others because he had been released from prison for over 15 years and he had not committed a sexual offense in the past 15 years.State v. Miller, 2013 Ark. 329 (2013).

Circuit court, which granted appellee's motion under this section to terminate his obligation to register as a sex offender, did not clearly err in concluding that appellee had proved by a preponderance of the evidence that appellee was not likely to pose a threat to the safety of others.State v. Khabeer, 2014 Ark. 107 (2014).

Petition to terminate defendant's obligation to report as a sex offender in Arkansas was denied because he failed to prove that he was no longer a safety threat; an offender profile report showed that defendant had engaged in sexual conduct with his daughter for many years and was good at hiding things. Moreover, he had a lengthy history of inappropriate sexual behaviors with a strong addictive element, he went back to engaging in certain behaviors after his release from prison, and he had a “true” finding regarding allegations of molesting his granddaughter in 2008.Stow v. State, 2016 Ark. App. 84, 482 S.W.3d 752 (2016).

Subdivision (a)(3) of this section, enacted in 2001, required lifetime sex offender registration for appellant, who had pled guilty on the same day in 2000 to a second sex offense involving a second victim under a separate case number. The Court of Appeals was not convinced that the statutory provision was meant to apply only to an offender who committed a second offense after having been convicted of a first offense; instead, the application of the provision to appellant fulfilled the legislative intent to protect the public from sex offenders who have been deemed more likely to reoffend because they have committed more than one offense and were prosecuted under different case numbers.Wyly v. State, 2018 Ark. App. 505, 559 S.W.3d 326 (2018).

As the Arkansas Code Revision Commission substantively altered Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21 in its codification of subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, in a manner that changed its meaning, a probationer may apply to terminate his or her obligation to register as a sex offender 15 years after being placed on probation. Further, the probationer is entitled to relief upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she has not been adjudicated of a sex offense during that 15-year period and he or she is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of others.Harrell v. State, 2012 Ark. 421 (2012).

Defendant's second-degree sexual abuse conviction under former §5-14-109 did not require defendant's lifetime sex offender registration; the crime was not substantially equivalent to aggravated sexual abuse under 18 U.S.C. § 2241, since second-degree sexual abuse did not require the use of force and required only sexual contact, while aggravated sexual abuse under the federal statute required a sexual act, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2246(2)(D).Myers v. State, 2017 Ark. App. 617, 535 S.W.3d 301 (2017).

If a court denies a petition to terminate the obligation to register under this section, the sex offender may not file a new petition to terminate the obligation to register under this section before three (3) years from the date the order denying the previous petition was filed.

The center shall remove a sex offender from the registry upon receipt by the center of adequate proof that the sex offender has died.

Public officials, public employees, and public agencies are immune from civil liability for good faith conduct under this subchapter.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be deemed to impose any liability upon or to give rise to a cause of action against any public official, public employee, or public agency for any discretionary decision to release relevant and necessary information, unless it is shown that the public official, public employee, or public agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

The provisions of this section shall also apply to persons or organizations assisting a public official, public employee, or public agency in performing official duties upon a written request to assist them by the public official, public employee, or public agency.

The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall consist of nine (9) members as follows:

One (1) member who is a criminal defense attorney;

One (1) member who is a prosecuting attorney;

One (1) member who is a licensed mental health professional and has demonstrated expertise in the treatment of sex offenders;

One (1) member who is a victims' rights advocate;

One (1) member who is a law enforcement officer; and

One (1) member with expertise in juvenile justice or treatment;

The Director of the Department of Correction or the director's designee;

The Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center or the director's designee.

The Director of the Department of Community Correction or the director's designee; and

(1)Members appointed by the Governor shall be for four-year staggered terms to be assigned by lot at the first meeting.

The members of the committee shall elect annually a chair and a vice chair from their membership.

The Director of the Department of Correction or the director's designee shall serve as the executive secretary.

(1)A majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The executive secretary of the committee shall keep full and true records of all committee proceedings and preserve all books, documents, and papers relating to the business of the committee.

The meetings shall be open to the public except when the committee is discussing, deliberating, or voting on an individual case.

(1)The committee shall report in writing to the Governor and to the Legislative Council by July 31 of each year.

A summary of the proceedings of the committee during the preceding fiscal year;

A detailed and itemized statement of all revenue and of all expenditures made by or on behalf of the committee;

Other information deemed necessary or useful; and

Any additional information that may be requested by the Governor and the Legislative Council.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “criminal” preceding “defense attorney” in (a)(1)(A).

(1)The alternative procedure under this section may be used for sexually dangerous person evaluations if information that was not available to the court at the time of trial emerges in the course of a sex offender evaluation.

If a mental abnormality or personality disorder is suspected, a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist qualified by the committee may conduct further assessment to determine the presence or absence of a mental abnormality or personality disorder.

If further assessment under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section is conducted by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist qualified by the committee, the report of the further assessment shall be presented to the committee.

(1)(A)A sex offender may challenge an assigned risk level by submitting a written request for an administrative review.

As part of the request for an administrative review, the sex offender may request in writing copies of all documents generated by the examiners, a listing by document name and source of all documents that may be available from other agencies having custody of those documents, and a copy of the tape of the interview.

The request for an administrative review shall be made in accordance with instructions provided on the risk level notification and within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the advisement of risk level notification to the sex offender by certified mail and first-class mail.

(A)The basis of the request for administrative review shall be clearly stated and any documentary evidence attached.

The basis for administrative review is:

The rules and procedures were not properly followed in reaching a decision on the risk level of the sex offender;

Amendments. The 2005 amendment made a stylistic change in (a)(1); deleted “After the effective date of this section” at the beginning of (a)(2)(A); and substituted “shall be” for “is” in (b)(1)(B).

The 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment rewrote (b).

The 2011 amendment, in (b)(5), substituted “the local enforcement agency having jurisdiction” for “law enforcement” and “at the level upon which” for “only at the level immediately below the level upon which”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 505 substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in the section heading, and in (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1129 inserted “administrative” in (b)(5).

Alleged sex offender's due process rights under the United States and Arkansas Constitutions were not violated by a determination that he was a Level 3 offender because he had a meaningful opportunity to be heard through a face-to-face interview and review by a sex offender assessment committee. A second face-to-face interview was not required.Burchette v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 374 Ark. 467, 288 S.W.3d 614 (2008).

After an appeal of a sex offender adjudication was dismissed on the ground that it could not be concluded that appellant had received notice of the Arkansas Department of Correction Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee's (SOSRA's) final decision, the court denied SOSRA's petition for rehearing because subdivisions (b)(6)(A) and (b)(7)(A) of this section required SOSRA to send “findings” to appellant, which proscription was consistent with the requirements of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-212(a).Munson v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Screening, 369 Ark. 290, 253 S.W.3d 901 (2007).

Trial court erred in dismissing as untimely appellant's petition for judicial review of an assessment declaring appellant to be a sex offender where the record did not contain any evidence that letters from the Arkansas Department of Correction Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee were sent to appellant by certified mail, as required by subdivision (b)(7)(A)(i) of this section. Without proof that the letters were properly sent, it could not be said that either letter constituted a final decision under §25-15-212(b).Munson v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Screening, 369 Ark. 290, 253 S.W.3d 901 (2007).

Where the Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee found that appellant was convicted of two separate sexual assaults on two separate women, admitted that he had been involved in forced sex acts, could not stand rejection, thought about raping, and said that raping made him feel better, there was substantial evidence to support the Committee's assessment of appellant as a level four offender. Because the Committee determined the presence of a mental abnormality or personality disorder by virtue of its review and assessment of appellant as a level four offender, the Committee complied with the provisions of subdivision (a)(2)(C) of this section.Parkman v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. 205, 307 S.W.3d 6 (2009).

Under §§12-12-913 and12-12-917, and this section, the evidence supported the sex offender's Level 2 assessment where his victim was outside the home and a Level 1 assessment only required notification inside the home and to local law enforcement, which was insufficient; the offender also indicated refusal to participate in sex-offender treatment.Gwaltney v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. App. 668 (2009).

This section gave the Sex Offender Assessment Committee authority to conduct its own assessment as to whether defendant was a sexually dangerous person.Dillard v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2016 Ark. App. 147, 485 S.W.3d 701 (2016).

Use a system that actively monitors and identifies the sex offender's location and timely reports or records his or her presence near or within a crime scene or in a prohibited area or his or her departure from specified geographic limitations; and

Contact the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction as soon as administratively feasible if the sex offender is in a prohibited area.

(a)A sex offender who claims to be indigent shall provide a completed certificate of indigency to the supervising agency.

The supervising agency may at any time review and redetermine whether a sex offender is indigent.

The certificate of indigency shall:

Be in a form approved by the supervising agency;

Be executed under oath by the sex offender; and

State in bold print that a false statement is punishable as a Class D felony.

However, the amount under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) per day.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in (a)(1); and substituted “dangerous person under” for “violent predator pursuant to” in (e)(1).

ALR.

Validity and Applicability of State Requirement That Person Convicted or Indicted of Sex Offenses Be Subject to Electronic Location Monitoring, Including Use of Satellite or Global Positioning System. 57 A.L.R.6th 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “A sex offender who is required to register” for “A person who is required to register as a sex offender” and inserted “in person”; in the introductory language of (b), substituted “The sex offender” for “the person” and inserted “in person” twice; and substituted “sex offender” for “person” in (b)(2).

A sex offender subject to electronic monitoring who violates subdivision (a)(2) of this section upon conviction is guilty of a Class C felony.

(1)A person who knowingly alters, tampers with, damages, or destroys any electronic monitoring equipment worn by a sexually dangerous person under this section upon conviction is guilty of a Class C felony.

A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where an out-of-state sex offender is moving or has moved may make immediate disclosure of the sex offender's registration in another state before the completion of a sex offender assessment assigning a community notification risk level.

A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where an out-of-state individual is moving or has moved who has been convicted of an offense that would require registration as a sex offender in Arkansas may make immediate notification appropriate for public safety before the completion of a sex offender assessment assigning a community notification risk level.

A sex offender who is required to register under this subchapter must report in person at least twenty-one (21) days before traveling outside of the United States to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction that he or she intends to travel outside of the United States.

The sex offender making the report in person under this section must also report in person to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction:

(1)A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction receiving a report under this section shall immediately report the information to the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The Department of Finance and Administration may release to a law enforcement officer or agency information contained in a person's motor vehicle record if:

A law enforcement officer or agency that obtains a record from the department as provided in subsection (a) of this section may publicly disclose information contained in a person's motor vehicle record if the disclosure of the information is:

This section does not authorize a law enforcement officer or agency to publicly disclose the following information obtained from a motor vehicle record:

The relevant records include, but are not limited to:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 17; 1999, No. 1353, §§ 10, 11; 2001, No. 1743, § 12; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 8; 2005, No. 1962, §§ 36, 37; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 5; 2007, No. 394, § 9; 2009, No. 758, § 25; 2013, No. 505, § 15; 2019, No. 315, §§ 865, 866; 2019, No. 910, §§
720-723.

12-12-918. Classification as sexually dangerous person.

(1)In order to classify a person as a sexually dangerous person, a prosecutor may allege on the face of an information that the prosecutor is seeking a determination that the defendant is a sexually dangerous person.

(A)If the defendant is adjudicated guilty, the court shall enter an order directing an examiner qualified by the Sex Offender Assessment Committee to issue a report to the sentencing court that recommends whether or not the defendant should be classified as a sexually dangerous person.

The sentencing court shall retain jurisdiction to determine whether a defendant is a sexually dangerous person for one (1) year after sentencing or for so long as the defendant remains incarcerated for the sex offense.

Should the aggravated sex offense box not be checked on the commitment order, the court will be contacted by the committee and asked to furnish a written determination as to whether the offense qualifies as an aggravated sex offense.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 18; 1999, No. 1353, § 12; 2001, No. 1743, § 13; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 9; 2013, No. 505, § 16; 2019, No. 910, §§ 724, 725.